Nebraska, session 109, LB952.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. The Supreme Court Operations Cash Fund is created. The State
Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall be used for court
and probation programs that enhance the administration of justice and improve
community safety. The fund shall consist of fees, grants, donations, gifts, and
payments received pursuant to contractual agreements with political
subdivisions for court services. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 24-209, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
24-209 (1) The Nebraska Appellate Courts Online Library shall be the
repository for the published judicial opinions of the Supreme Court and the
Court of Appeals which have been designated for permanent publication. All
previous official bound and printed volumes of the appellate courts' opinions
shall be made available on the Nebraska Appellate Courts Online Library. Other
distribution of such electronic opinions shall be as directed by the Supreme
Court.
(2) As directed by the Supreme Court, extra circulating copies of
previously printed volumes or issues of the Nebraska Reports, Nebraska
Appellate Reports, Nebraska Advance Sheets, and Decisions of the Nebraska Court
of Appeals may be sold as prescribed by the Supreme Court. The money received
from such sales shall be paid into the Supreme Court Reports Cash Fund which is
hereby created. The fund terminates on the operative date of this act, and the
State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the
General Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 29-3921, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
29-3921 (1) The Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund is
created. The fund shall be used for the operations of the commission , except
that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature through June 30, 2011. The Commission on Public Advocacy
Operations Cash Fund shall consist of money remitted pursuant to section
33-156. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission shall be funded
solely from the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) On July 1, 2011, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible,
the State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the
Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund to the Supreme Court
Education Fund. The State Court Administrator shall use these funds to assist
the juvenile justice system in providing prefiling and diversion programming
designed to reduce excessive absenteeism and unnecessary involvement with the
juvenile justice system.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer the following amounts from the
Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund to the Court Appointed
Special Advocate Fund:
(a) On July 1, 2011, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible,
one hundred thousand dollars; and
(b) On July 1, 2012, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible,
two hundred thousand dollars.
(4) On July 1, 2012, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible,
the State Treasurer shall transfer sixty thousand dollars from the Commission
on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund.
The Nebraska State Patrol shall use such funds to contract with the
University of Nebraska to study sex offender recidivism data before and after
the passage of Laws 2009, LB285, which changed the Nebraska sex offender
classification system from an evaluation of risk assessment system to an
offense-based assessment system in the attempt by the state to comply with
federal requirements under the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of
2006.
Sec. 4. Section 43-3701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-3701 Sections 43-3701 to 43-3718 43-3720 shall be known and may be
-1-

LB952 LB952
2026 2026
cited as the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act.
Sec. 5. Section 43-3717, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-3717 The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The safety and well-being of abused and neglected children throughout
the State of Nebraska should be of paramount concern to the state and its
residents;
(2) Court appointed special advocate volunteers provide a unique and vital
service to the children they represent and work to ensure the safety and well-
being of abused and neglected children; and
(3) Court appointed special advocate volunteers have provided, in many
cases, the judges who adjudicate cases with essential information that has not
only ensured the safety and well-being of abused and neglected children
throughout Nebraska, but has also saved the state thousands of dollars. ; and
(4) Providing resources through a grant program will increase the savings
to the state through court appointed special advocate programs.
Sec. 6. Section 43-3718, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-3718 The Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund is created. The fund
terminates on the operative date of this act, and the State Treasurer shall
transfer any money in the fund on such date to the General Fund. This section
terminates on January 1, 2027. The fund shall be under the control of the
Supreme Court and administered by the State Court Administrator. The fund shall
be used for grants as provided in section 43-3719. The fund shall consist of
transfers, grants, donations, gifts, devises, and bequests. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Interest earned shall be credited back to the fund.
Sec. 7. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 8. Original sections 29-3921, 43-3701, 43-3717, and 43-3718, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 24-209, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 9. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 43-3719
and 43-3720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-